Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 3. Payment for Interests in Production

Purpose of act. —

This act was designed to protect royalty owners and permit them to determine if correct payment of royalties has been made; the act is remedial and its provisions are construed liberally to achieve its remedial purpose. Wold v. Hunt Oil Co., 52 F. Supp. 2d 1330, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9670 (D. Wyo. 1999).

Penalty assessed for withholding royalties on oil or gas producedbefore 1982. —

An interest penalty can be assessed against a payor who withheld royalty payments on oil or gas that was produced before June 1, 1982, the effective date of this article; the district court holding that imposed the penalty in § 30-5-303(a), to the extent that a producer who had withheld proceeds from early 1980 held those proceeds after December 1, 1982, giving the producer the benefit of the six-month grace period of § 30-5-301(a), was affirmed. Independent Producers Mktg. Corp. v. Cobb, 721 P.2d 1106,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 593

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Royalty Payment Act,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 823 (1996).

§ 30-5-301.
Payment for production; time for payment; payor.

The proceeds derived from the sale of production from any well producing oil, gas or related hydrocarbons in the state of Wyoming shall be paid to all persons legally entitled thereto, except as hereinafter provided, commencing not later than six (6) months after the first day of the month following the date of first sale and thereafter not later than sixty (60) days after the end of the calendar month within which subsequent production is sold, unless other periods or arrangements for the first and subsequent payments are provided for in a valid contract with the person or persons entitled to such proceeds. Payment shall be made directly to the person or persons entitled thereto by the lessee or operator or by any party who assumes such payment obligation under any legal arrangement.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section:

Payments shall be remitted to the person or persons entitled to proceeds from production annually for the aggregate of up to twelve (12) months accumulation of proceeds if the total amount owed is one hundred dollars ($100.00) or less;

Notwithstanding paragraph (i) of this subsection, upon written request of the payee, payments shall be remitted to the payee within sixty (60) days following receipt of the request if the aggregation of the proceeds is twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or greater;

In no case shall payments be made under this section later than twelve (12) months following the date of cessation of production;

Payments shall be remitted to entitled persons within twelve (12) months following the date the payor is no longer responsible for the payments.

The lessee or operator is exempt from the provisions of W.S.

30-5-301

through

30-5-303

, and the purchaser shall assume the operator’s responsibilities for making such payments if the operator and purchaser have entered into arrangements whereby the proceeds are paid by the purchaser to those legally entitled thereto.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 27, § 1; 1997, ch. 133, § 1.

Preexisting legal obligation required. —

The legislature's intent, as expressed in the plain language of the statutory provisions, was to limit the application of this article to cases where a preexisting legal obligation for payment of the proceeds of the sale of hydrocarbons exists. ANR Prod. Co. v. Kerr-McGee Corp., 893 P.2d 698,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1995).

This act unambiguously requires

the party who has the legal obligation to pay any proceeds from the production of an oil or gas well to make the payments in accordance with either the time set out in the statute or within a time frame established by a legal agreement between the parties. Failure to do so results in liability for the amount of the unpaid proceeds plus 18 percent per annum interest. There are no exceptions. Ferguson v. Coronado Oil Co., 884 P.2d 971,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1994).

No reporting required before first day of sale. —

When plaintiff royalty interest owner sued defendant oil and gas company under the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act (WRPA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-301

et seq., the district court held that defendant did not comply with WRPA's reporting requirements under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-305(b); the evidence presented at trial showed that the oil company failed to submit complete monthly reports from July of 2000 through March of 2002. The district court erred by finding that defendant was required to report beginning in November of 1999, because its first sale was not until December of 1999; Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-301

only required payment within six months after the first day of the month following the first day of sale.
Morris v. CMS Oil & Gas Co., 2010 WY 37, 227 P.3d 325,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2010).

Nonoperating interests not liable under WRPA. —

When defendant companies sought to develop oil and gas interests, they entered into an agreement with a leaseholder for assignment of leases and for a Net Profits Interest (NPI) in which defendants agreed to pay 5% of the net profits to the leaseholder. When plaintiff successors in interest demanded payment of the NPI, the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that the operator was responsible for paying the NPI owner under the contract; therefore, the non-operator working interest owners were not responsible to plaintiffs under the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

30-5-301

through 305.
Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2010 WY 36, 226 P.3d 889,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2010).

Equity not a factor. —

The Royalty Payment Act is a remedial statute intended to stop oil producers from retaining other people's money for their own use. Equity is not a factor for consideration because there are no exceptions in the Act providing justification for royalty nonpayment. Cities Serv. Oil & Gas Corp. v. State, 838 P.2d 146,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1992).

Letter referencing conveyance documents satisfied notice ofownership requirement under WRPA. —

When defendant companies sought to develop oil and gas interests, they entered into an agreement with a leaseholder for assignment of leases and for a Net Profits Interest (NPI) in which defendants agreed to pay 5% of the net profits to the leaseholder; the relevant leases began generating net profits in May 2005. Plaintiff successors in interest gave the unit operator notice of their ownership of the NPI in a letter which included a chronological chain of title which referenced all of the conveyance documents and included a title opinion recognizing the title transfer; the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that the letter satisfied the requirements of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 30-5-301(a), 30-5-305(b) of the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act, which triggered defendants'
obligation to make payments.
Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2010 WY 36, 226 P.3d 889,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2010).

Dismissal proper for lack of jurisdiction. —

Trial court did not abuse its discretion when it granted the State's voluntary dismissal of suit it had instituted against an energy company relating to certain revenues alleged due on oil and gas wells, based on its lack of subject matter jurisdiction, and in refusing company's claim for fees and costs. EOG Res., Inc. v. State, 2003 WY 34, 64 P.3d 757,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2003).

State was not entitled to interest on delayed royalty payments

for the period of October 1979 through June 1982, where the working-interest owner did not discover the deficiency in royalty payments until 1987, when it promptly compensated the state for those underpayments and, although the working-interest owner may have been enriched by its failure to pay royalties when they became due, it was not unjustly enriched since it did not withhold payment after learning that the deficiency existed. State v. BHP Petroleum Co., 804 P.2d 671,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1991).

Quoted

in

Moncrief v. Harvey, 816 P.2d 97,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1991); Lon V. Smith Found. v. Devon Energy Corp., 2017 WY 121, 403 P.3d 997,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

AMOCO Prod. Co. v. EM Nominee Partnership Co., 886 P.2d 265,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1994); Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2015 WY 40,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Mar. 19, 2015).

§ 30-5-302.
Payment for production; interest on late payments.

Any delay in determining any person legally entitled to an interest in the proceeds from production shall not affect payments to all other persons entitled to payment. In instances where payment cannot be made for any reason within the time limits specified in W.S. 30-5-301(a), the lessee or operator, purchaser or other party legally responsible for payment shall deposit all proceeds credited to the eventual interest owner to an escrow account in a federally insured bank or savings and loan institution in Wyoming, using a standard escrow document form approved by the attorney general of Wyoming, which deposit shall earn interest at the highest rate being offered by that institution for the amount and term of such deposits. The escrow agent may commingle monies received into escrow from any one lessee or operator, purchaser or other party legally responsible for payment. Payment of principal and accrued interest from such accounts shall be paid by the escrow agent to all persons legally entitled thereto within thirty (30) days from the date of receipt by the escrow agent of final legal determination of entitlement thereto. If the escrow agent is unable to deliver the payment to the legally entitled person within three (3) years from the end of the month in which the escrow agent first received notice of the person legally entitled to the payment, the payment shall be considered unclaimed for purposes of W.S.

34-24-101

through

34-24-139

. Applicable escrow fees shall be deducted from the payments.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 27, § 1; 1993, ch. 213, § 2.

Disputes over amount of payment within statute. —

The words “any reason” in the second sentence establish a clear intent to include disputes over the correct amount of payment to be made as well as a dispute over the correct payee. Moncrief v. Harvey, 816 P.2d 97,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. Aug. 9, 1991).

The trial court properly determined that the defendants' failure to pay royalty proceeds to the plaintiff, who had contested the amount of royalties due, brought them within the statute, and their failure to place the disputed funds in escrow made them liable for interest. Moncrief v. Harvey, 816 P.2d 97,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. Aug. 9, 1991).

Oil company liable under WRPA for delayed royalty payments.—

When plaintiff royalty interest owner sued defendant oil and gas company under the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act (WRPA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-301

et seq., the district court held that defendant did not comply with WRPA's reporting requirements, failed to timely pay royalties in accordance with Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-302

, and in some instances had held plaintiff's royalties in escrow. Defendant was required to pay a penalty interest under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

30-5-302

, 30-5-303(a).
Morris v. CMS Oil & Gas Co., 2010 WY 37, 227 P.3d 325,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2010).

Defendants withholding royalty payments were ordered to paystatutory interest and penalties under WRPA. —

When defendant companies sought to develop oil and gas interests, they entered into an agreement with a leaseholder for assignment of leases and for a Net Profits Interest (NPI) in which defendants agreed to pay 5% of the net profits to the leaseholder; the relevant leases began generating net profits in May 2005. Once plaintiffs had given notice of their ownership of the NPI in February 2006, the operator defendants had an obligation to pay them under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-301(a), or to at least deposit the proceeds into escrow as allowed by the good faith provision of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-302

; because defendants failed to do so, the district court correctly ruled they were obligated to pay plaintiffs interest and penalties under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-303

.
Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2010 WY 36, 226 P.3d 889,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2010).

Failure to hold suspended funds in interest-bearing escrow account.—

District court properly granted summary judgment to an oil and gas producer on a claim by a testator's foundation's that the producer failed to properly hold suspended funds in an interest-bearing escrow account because the testator's foundation was not legally entitled to the testator's overriding royalty interest even though the producer's successor paid the suspense account monies to the foundation. Lon V. Smith Found. v. Devon Energy Corp., 2017 WY 121, 403 P.3d 997,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2017).

District court properly granted summary judgment to an oil and gas producer on a claim by a testator’s foundation’s that the producer failed to properly hold suspended funds in an interest-bearing escrow account because the testator’s foundation was not legally entitled to the testator’s overriding royalty interest even though the producer’s successor paid the suspense account monies to the foundation. Lon V. Smith Found. v. Devon Energy Corp., 2017 WY 121, 403 P.3d 997,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 30-5-303.
Payment for production; penalty for violation; jurisdiction; costs and fees.

Any lessee or operator, purchaser or other party legally responsible for payment who violates the provisions of this article is liable to the person or persons legally entitled to proceeds from production for the unpaid amount of such proceeds, plus interest at the rate of eighteen percent (18%) per annum on the unpaid principal balance from the due date specified in W.S. 30-5-301(a).

The district court for the county in which a well producing oil, gas or related hydrocarbons is located has jurisdiction over all proceedings brought pursuant to this article and the prevailing party in any proceedings brought pursuant to this article shall be entitled to recover all court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

Any person who fails to provide royalty information as provided in W.S. 30-5-305(b) is liable to the affected royalty, overriding royalty or other nonworking interest owner in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100.00) per month that complete reporting is not provided to the interest owner.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 27, § 1; 1989, ch. 255, § 2.

Jurisdiction. —

Wyoming Royalty Payment Act (WRPA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-303(b), does not confer exclusive jurisdiction over claims brought under it in the district court of a county in which a particular well is located; rather the intent of the WRPA is to allow the claims to be brought in the district court of any county in which a well is located. BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Madsen, 2002 WY 135, 53 P.3d 1088,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2002).

Preexisting legal obligation required. —

The legislature's intent, as expressed in the plain language of the statutory provisions, was to limit the application of this article to cases where a preexisting legal obligation for payment of the proceeds of the sale of hydrocarbons exists. ANR Prod. Co. v. Kerr-McGee Corp., 893 P.2d 698,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1995).

Failure to provide complete reporting. —

Causes of action for recovery of the $100 per month penalty imposed under § 30-5-303(c) of the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

30-5-301

to

30-5-305

, for failure to provide complete reporting as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-305

(b) and for improperly deducting costs of production as defined in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-304(a)(vi), accrued when the statutes were violated or when a plaintiff knew or had reason to know of the existence of the violations. Cabot Oil & Gas Corp. v. Followill, 2004 WY 80, 93 P.3d 238,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2004).

Sanction precipitated by failure to pay proceeds of production following first sale. —

The sanction for violation of § 30-5-301(a) found in subsection (a) of this section is precipitated by the payor's failure to pay the proceeds of production at any time more than six months after the first day of the first month after the date of the first sale, not by the production of oil or gas. Independent Producers Mktg. Corp. v. Cobb, 721 P.2d 1106,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 593

(Wyo. 1986).

One year statute of limitations applies. —

The one year statute of limitations relating to the penalty for failure to properly report under the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

30-5-301

to

30-5-305

, begins to run if, and when, the producer issues a proper report. Failure to apply the discovery rule would encourage producers to omit deductions from royalty statements, hoping it would mitigate deduction for a year and avoid paying a proper royalty amount. Cabot Oil & Gas Corp. v. Followill, 2004 WY 80, 93 P.3d 238,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2004).

No exceptions to requirements. —

This act unambiguously requires the party who has the legal obligation to pay any proceeds from the production of an oil or gas well to make the payments in accordance with either the time set out in the statute or within a time frame established by a legal agreement between the parties. Failure to do so results in liability for the amount of the unpaid proceeds plus 18 percent per annum interest. There are no exceptions. Ferguson v. Coronado Oil Co., 884 P.2d 971,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1994).

Nonexecutive owner not subject to interest payments. —

The nonexecutive owner of a working interest in a gas well, which was not legally responsible for the actual remittance of its share of royalties to the owner of an overriding royalty interest, was not subject to the payment of interest for wrongfully withheld proceeds. Moncrief v. Harvey, 816 P.2d 97,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. Aug. 9, 1991).

A payor became liable for penalty interest

on unpaid royalties under a “federal floor” provision in its natural gas lease with the state when it failed to include ad valorem, severance and/or conservation tax reimbursements in its calculation of state royalty amounts while making comparable royalty payments to the federal government which included tax reimbursements. Cities Serv. Oil & Gas Corp. v. State, 838 P.2d 146,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1992).

Plaintiffs who established their right to mineral royalties were prevailing parties entitled to fee award. —

When defendant companies sought to develop oil and gas interests, they entered into an agreement with a leaseholder for assignment of leases and for a Net Profits Interest (NPI) in which defendants agreed to pay 5% of the net profits to the leaseholder; in an action to enforce the agreement under the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act (WRPA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

30-5-301

through 305, plaintiffs established their right to the mineral royalty and were entitled to payments from defendant operating companies. As prevailing parties, plaintiffs were entitled to recover attorney fees under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-303

; although defendant nonoperating parties were not liable for the payment of royalties, they were not prevailing parties for purposes of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-303

.
Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2010 WY 36, 226 P.3d 889,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2010).

Defendants withholding royalty payments were ordered to pay statutory interest and penalties under WRPA. —

When defendant companies sought to develop oil and gas interests, they entered into an agreement with a leaseholder for assignment of leases and for a Net Profits Interest (NPI) in which defendants agreed to pay 5% of the net profits to the leaseholder; the relevant leases began generating net profits in May 2005. Once plaintiffs had given notice of their ownership of the NPI in February 2006, the operator defendants had an obligation to pay them under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-301(a), or to at least deposit the proceeds into escrow as allowed by the good faith provision of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-302

; because defendants failed to do so, the district court correctly ruled they were obligated to pay plaintiffs interest and penalties under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-303

.
Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2010 WY 36, 226 P.3d 889,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2010).

Royalty owner entitled to attorney fees as prevailing party in an action under WRPA. —

When plaintiff royalty interest owner sued defendant oil and gas company under the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act (WRPA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-301

et seq., the district court held that defendant did not comply with WRPA's reporting requirements, failed to timely pay royalties in accordance with Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-302

, and in some instances had held plaintiff's royalties in escrow. Defendant was ordered to pay a penalty interest under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

30-5-302

, 30-5-303(a), and was not a prevailing party for purposes of attorney fees; plaintiff was entitled to recover attorney fees under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-303(b), as she was the prevailing party in the suit.
Morris v. CMS Oil & Gas Co., 2010 WY 37, 227 P.3d 325,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2010).

Calculation of penalties and interest. —

When plaintiff royalty interest owner sued defendant oil and gas company under the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act (WRPA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-301

et seq., the district court held that defendant did not comply with WRPA's reporting requirements under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-305(b); the evidence presented at trial showed that the oil company failed to submit complete monthly reports from July of 2000 through March of 2002. The district court erred by finding that defendant was required to report beginning in November of 1999, because its first sale was not until December of 1999; therefore, the district court's calculation of penalties and interest under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-303(b) based on defendant's failure to report for 29 months was in error.
Morris v. CMS Oil & Gas Co., 2010 WY 37, 227 P.3d 325,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2010).

Cited

in

EOG Res., Inc. v. State, 2003 WY 34,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 42

, 64 P.3d 757 (Wyo. 2003).

Entitlement to attorney fees as prevailing party.—

District court properly denied attorney fees to an oil and gas producer and a testator's foundation because they did not have a pre-existing legal relationship requiring the producer to pay fees on the testator's overriding royalty interest and neither party was the prevailing party. Lon V. Smith Found. v. Devon Energy Corp., 2017 WY 121, 403 P.3d 997,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2017).

District court properly denied attorney fees to an oil and gas producer and a testator’s foundation because they did not have a pre-existing legal relationship requiring the producer to pay fees on the testator’s overriding royalty interest and neither party was the prevailing party. Lon V. Smith Found. v. Devon Energy Corp., 2017 WY 121, 403 P.3d 997,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 30-5-304.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Lessee” means the person entitled under an oil and gas lease to drill and operate wells, paying the lessor a royalty and retaining the remainder, known as the working interest. The lessee pays all costs of production out of his interest, the lessor’s interest being free and clear of all those costs;

“Lessor” means the mineral owner who has executed a lease and who is entitled to the payment of a royalty on production, free and clear of the costs of production;

“Operator” means a person engaged in the business of drilling and producing wells for oil and gas;

“Other nonworking interest” means any interest in an oil and gas lease or well which is not a royalty, overriding royalty or working interest;

“Overriding royalty” means a share of production, free of the costs of production, carved out of the lessee’s interest under an oil and gas lease;

“Costs of production” means all costs incurred for exploration, development, primary or enhanced recovery and abandonment operations including, but not limited to lease acquisition, drilling and completion, pumping or lifting, recycling, gathering, compressing, pressurizing, heater treating, dehydrating, separating, storing or transporting the oil to the storage tanks or the gas into the market pipeline. “Costs of production” does not include the reasonable and actual direct costs associated with transporting the oil from the storage tanks to market or the gas from the point of entry into the market pipeline or the processing of gas in a processing plant;

“Royalty” means the mineral owner’s share of production, free of the costs of production;

“Working interest” means the interest granted under an oil and gas lease, giving the lessee the right to work on the leased property to search for, develop and produce oil and gas and the obligation to pay all costs of production;

“This act” means W.S.

30-5-301

through

30-5-305

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 255, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Costs of production. —

Under express, unambiguous language of this section, charges termed “gathering charges” were specifically included as nondeductible costs of production. Wold v. Hunt Oil Co., 52 F. Supp. 2d 1330, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9670 (D. Wyo. 1999).

Calculating royalties. —

Oil company was incorrect when it claimed that royalties were calculated on the basis of the sales proceeds less the costs of transportation. Cabot Oil & Gas Corp. v. Followill, 2004 WY 80, 93 P.3d 238,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2004).

Failure to provide complete reporting. —

Causes of action for recovery of the $100 per month penalty imposed under § 30-5-303(c) of the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

30-5-301

to

30-5-305

, for failure to provide complete reporting as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-305

(b) and for improperly deducting costs of production as defined in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-304(a)(vi), accrued when the statutes were violated or when a plaintiff knew or had reason to know of the existence of the violations. Cabot Oil & Gas Corp. v. Followill, 2004 WY 80, 93 P.3d 238,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2004).

Overriding royalty.—

Agreement
providing for payment of royalties by bankruptcy debtors for coal
extraction was subject to rejection by the debtors as an executory
contract since the agreement did not convey an overriding royalty
interest in the underlying real property in the absence of any words
of conveyance in the agreement or any reference to underlying federal
leases, and the agreement was entirely contractual in nature. In re Alpha Natural Res., Inc., 555 B.R. 520, 2016 Bankr. LEXIS 3255 (Bankr. E.D. Va. 2016), aff'd, 237 F. Supp. 3d 369, 2017 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 24074 (E.D. Va. 2017).

In a dispute between the owner of overriding royalty interests carved out of federal oil and gas leases and the operator under the leases, the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act could not apply retroactively to change the implied wellhead pricing term under the contract because the Act highlighted the Wyoming legislature’s intent to allow parties’ contractual freedom. Jonah LLC v. Ultra Petro. Corp. (In re Ultra Petro. Corp.), 611 B.R. 813, 2019 Bankr. LEXIS 3860 (Bankr. S.D. Tex. 2019).

Applied

in

Moncrief v. Harvey, 816 P.2d 97,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1991).

Quoted

in

Boley v. Greenough, 2001 WY 47, 22 P.3d 854,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2010 WY 36, 226 P.3d 889,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Mar. 23, 2010).

§ 30-5-305.
Collection; reporting and remittance of royalties.

Unless otherwise expressly provided for by specific language in an executed written agreement, “royalty”, “overriding royalty”, “other nonworking interests” and “working interests” shall be interpreted as defined in W.S.

30-5-304

. A division order may not alter or amend the terms of an oil or gas lease or other contractual agreement. A division order that alters or amends the terms of an oil and gas lease or other contractual agreement is invalid to the extent of the alteration or amendment and the terms of the oil and gas lease or other contractual agreement shall take precedence.

Whenever payment is made for oil or gas production to an interest owner, all of the following information shall be included and labeled on the check stub or on an attachment to the form of payment, unless the information is otherwise provided on a regular monthly basis:

The lease, property or well name or any lease, property or well identification number used to identify the lease property or well;

The month and year during which sales occurred for which payment is being made;

The total number of barrels of oil or thousands of cubic feet of gas sold;

The price per barrel of oil or the price per thousand cubic feet of gas;

The total amount of state severance, ad valorem and other production taxes;

An itemized list of any other deductions or adjustments;

The net value of total sales after deductions;

The owner’s interest in sales from the lease, property, or well expressed as a decimal;

The owner’s share of the total value of sales prior to any deductions;

The owner’s share of the sales value less deductions; and

An address where additional information pertaining to the owner’s interest in production may be obtained and questions answered. If information is requested by certified mail, an answer must be mailed by certified mail within thirty (30) days of receipt of the request.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 255, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Royalty Valuation: Should Overriding Royalty Interests and Nonparticipating Royalty Interests, Whether Payable in Value or in Kind, Be Subject to the Same Valuation Standard as Lease Royalty?,” see XXXV Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (2000).

Retroactivity.—

In a dispute between the owner of overriding royalty interests carved out of federal oil and gas leases and the operator under the leases, the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act could not apply retroactively to change the implied wellhead pricing term under the contract because the Act highlighted the Wyoming legislature’s intent to allow parties’ contractual freedom. Jonah LLC v. Ultra Petro. Corp. (In re Ultra Petro. Corp.), 611 B.R. 813, 2019 Bankr. LEXIS 3860 (Bankr. S.D. Tex. 2019).

Ambiguity in assignments. —

District court could consider a division order which indicated that the corporation's predecessors in interest owned a .625 percent overriding royalty interest and was not prohibited by the section; the division order was not used to alter or amend the terms of the assignments but only to assist the trial court in resolving the inherent ambiguity in the assignments. Wadi Petroleum, Inc. v. Ultra Res., Inc., 2003 WY 41, 65 P.3d 703,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2003).

Failure to provide complete reporting. —

Causes of action for recovery of the $100 per month penalty imposed under § 30-5-303(c) of the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

30-5-301

to

30-5-305

, for failure to provide complete reporting as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-305

(b) and for improperly deducting costs of production as defined in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-304(a)(vi), accrued when the statutes were violated or when a plaintiff knew or had reason to know of the existence of the violations. Cabot Oil & Gas Corp. v. Followill, 2004 WY 80, 93 P.3d 238,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2004).

When plaintiff royalty interest owner sued defendant oil and gas company under the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act (WRPA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-301

et seq., the district court held that defendant did not comply with WRPA's reporting requirements under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-305(b); the evidence presented at trial showed that the oil company failed to submit complete monthly reports from July of 2000 through March of 2002. The district court erred by finding that defendant was required to report beginning in November of 1999, because its first sale was not until December of 1999.
Morris v. CMS Oil & Gas Co., 2010 WY 37, 227 P.3d 325,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2010).

Letter of ownership triggered unit operator's obligation to pay royalties. —

When defendant companies sought to develop oil and gas interests, they entered into an agreement with a leaseholder for assignment of leases and for a Net Profits Interest (NPI) in which defendants agreed to pay 5% of the net profits to the leaseholder; the relevant leases began generating net profits in May 2005. Plaintiff successors in interest gave the unit operator notice of their ownership of the NPI in a letter dated February 22, 2006 as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 30-5-301(a), 30-5-305(b) of the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act, which triggered defendants'
obligation to pay beginning in March 2006; the contract protected defendants from liability prior to receiving notice of plaintiffs'
interests.
Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2010 WY 36, 226 P.3d 889,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2010).

Cited in

Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2015 WY 40, 2015 Wyo. LEXIS
45 (Mar. 19, 2015).

Applied

in

Double Eagle Petroleum & Mining Corp. v. Questar Exploration &, Prod. Co., 2003 WY 139, 78 P.3d 679,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2003).